Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4917.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 157. (1) Only a grader approved by the department shall grade butter. (2) Standards for grading are those described in 7 C.F.R. CFR part 58. (3) As used in this section, "grade" "grading" means the classification of butter by its examination for flavor, aroma, body and texture, color, salt, package, and such any other factors as may be approved by the department.